New York, session 2025-2026, S8494.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1, 2 and 4 of section 202-l of the labor law, 2 as added by chapter 393 of the laws of 2014, paragraph (a) of subdivi- 3 sion 2 as amended by chapter 376 of the laws of 2014, are amended to 4 read as follows: 5 1. During the time that an emergency exists following a declaration of 6 such emergency pursuant to section twenty-four or twenty-eight of the 7 executive law, or during a United States Air Force or United States 8 Coast Guard assigned mission, an employee may request and shall be 9 granted a leave of absence from [his or her] their employer while 10 engaged in the actual performance of [his or her] the employee's duties 11 as, (a) a volunteer firefighter, [or] (b) an enrolled member of a volun- 12 teer ambulance service pursuant to article thirty of the public health 13 law, or (c) a member of the United States Air Force Auxiliary Civil Air 14 Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary Pilots unless the 15 employer determines that the employee's absence would impose an undue 16 hardship on the conduct of the employer's business as defined by para- 17 graph (d) of subdivision ten of section two hundred ninety-six of the 18 executive law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13654-05-6 S. 8494--C 2 1 2. Subdivision one of this section shall apply only when: 2 (a) The employer has previously received written documentation from 3 the head of the employee's volunteer fire department or volunteer ambu- 4 lance service or unit commander, as applicable, notifying the employer 5 of the employee's status as a volunteer firefighter or member of a 6 volunteer ambulance service or member of the United States Air Force 7 Auxiliary Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary 8 Pilots; and 9 (b) The employee's duties as a volunteer firefighter [or], member of a 10 volunteer ambulance service, or member of the United States Air Force 11 Auxiliary Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary 12 Pilots are related to the declared emergency; and 13 (c) In the case of members of the United States Air Force Auxiliary 14 Civil Air Patrol or the United States Coast Guard Auxiliary Pilots, upon 15 written request from a unit commander to participate in emergency 16 services or during a United States Air Force or United States Coast 17 Guard assigned mission. 18 4. Upon the employer's request, an employee who has been granted a 19 leave of absence in accordance with this section shall provide [his or 20 her] their employer with a notarized statement from the head of the 21 volunteer fire department or volunteer ambulance service, or unit 22 commander, as applicable, certifying the period of time, or times, that 23 said employee responded to any emergency pursuant to this section. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.